North Carolina, session 2025, SB19.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

DESIGNATE JOCKEY'S RIDGE AS AN AREA OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONCERN
SECTION 1. Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 113A-113.1. Designation of Jockey's Ridge as an area of environmental concern.
(a) Description. – Jockey's Ridge is the tallest active sand dune (medano) along the
Atlantic Coast of the United States. Located within the town of Nags Head in Dare County,
between U.S. 158 and Roanoke Sound, Jockey's Ridge represents the southern extremity of a
back barrier dune system which extends north along Currituck Spit into Virginia. Given the status
of Jockey's Ridge as a State Park, State Nature Preserve, complex natural area, and an area
containing a unique geological formation as identified by the State Geologist, the General
Assembly designates Jockey's Ridge as a unique coastal geological formation area of
environmental concern, as authorized by G.S. 113A-113(b)(4)g.
(b) Boundaries. – The boundaries of the Jockey's Ridge area of environmental concern
shall be as depicted on a map approved by the Coastal Resources Commission on December 4,
1987. The Coastal Resources Commission may approve subsequent maps as needed to effectuate
the protection of the Jockey's Ridge area of environmental concern consistent with subsection (c)
of this section. The area of environmental concern includes the entire rights-of-way of U.S. 158
Bypass, SR 1221 (Sound Side Road), Virginia Dare Trail, and Conch Street where these roads
bound this area. The Division of Coastal Management shall provide public access to a map
depicting the boundaries of the Jockey's Ridge area of environmental concern by maintaining a
copy at the Division's office and on the Division's public website.
(c) Use Standards. – Development within the Jockey's Ridge area of environmental
concern shall be consistent with the following minimum use standards:
*S19-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Development that requires the removal of greater than 10 cubic yards of sand
per year within the area of environmental concern boundary shall require a
permit pursuant to this Article or rules adopted thereunder.
(2) All sand that is removed from within the area of environmental concern
boundary in accordance with subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
deposited at locations within the Jockey's Ridge State Park designated by the
Division of Coastal Management in consultation with the Division of Parks
and Recreation.
(3) Development activities shall not significantly alter or retard the free
movement of sand except when necessary for the purpose of maintaining or
constructing a road, residential or commercial structure, accessway, lawn or
garden, or parking area, unless allowed by the Management Plan of Jockey's
Ridge State Park as developed pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.52."

REQUIRE THE DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION TO HOLD A PUBLIC
HEARING AND CONSULT WITH THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE COMMISSION ON
GOVERNMENTAL OPERATIONS PRIOR TO GRANTING CERTAIN EASEMENTS
ON STATE PROPERTY
SECTION 2.(a) Article 7 of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 146-29.3. Disposition of easements for spoil disposal and dumping rights.
Notwithstanding G.S. 146-11, if a proposed disposition is an easement for disposal of spoil
materials lawfully dug or dredged from navigable waters, or dumping rights for spoil materials
lawfully dug or dredged from navigable waters, the Department of Administration may not grant
the easement or dumping rights until it completes both of the following requirements:
(1) Hold a public hearing in the county where the proposed disposition is located.
(2) Following the public hearing, submit the proposed disposition for consultation
with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations in
accordance with G.S. 120-76.1(b)."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective August 1, 2025, and applies to
requests for proposed dispositions submitted to the Department of Administration for approval
on or after that date.

CLARIFY THE APPLICABILITY OF STATUTORY BUILT-UPON AREA
REQUIREMENTS FOR STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT STORMWATER
PROGRAMS AND SPECIFY THAT CERTAIN ARTIFICIAL TURF IS NOT
BUILT-UPON AREA
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 143-214.7(b2) reads as rewritten:
"(b2) For purposes of implementing stormwater programs, "built-upon area" means
impervious surface and partially impervious surface to the extent that the partially impervious
surface does not allow water to infiltrate through the surface and into the subsoil. "Built-upon
area" does not include a slatted deck; the water area of a swimming pool; a surface of number 57
stone, as designated by the American Society for Testing and Materials, laid at least four inches
thick over a geotextile fabric; a trail as defined in G.S. 113A-85 that is either unpaved or paved
as long as the pavement is porous with a hydraulic conductivity greater than 0.001 centimeters
per second (1.41 inches per hour); or landscaping material, including, but not limited to, gravel,
mulch, sand, and vegetation, placed on areas that receive pedestrian or bicycle traffic or on
portions of driveways and parking areas that will not be compacted by the weight of a vehicle,
such as the area between sections of pavement that support the weight of a vehicle. The owner
or developer of a property may opt out of any of the exemptions from "built-upon area" set out
Page 2 Senate Bill 19-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
in this subsection. For State stormwater programs and local stormwater programs approved
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, all of the following shall apply:
(1) The volume, velocity, and discharge rates of water associated with the
one-year, 24-hour storm and the difference in stormwater runoff from the
predevelopment and postdevelopment conditions for the one-year, 24-hour
storm shall be calculated using any acceptable engineering hydrologic and
hydraulic methods.
(2) Development may occur within the area that would otherwise be required to
be placed within a vegetative buffer required by the Commission pursuant to
G.S. 143-214.1 and this section provided the stormwater runoff from the
entire impervious area of the development is collected, treated, and discharged
so that it passes through a segment of the vegetative buffer and is managed so
that it otherwise complies with all applicable State and federal stormwater
management requirements. For the purpose of this subdivision, the entire
impervious area of the development shall not include any portion of a project
that is within a North Carolina Department of Transportation or municipal
right-of-way.
(3) The requirements that apply to development activities within one-half mile of
and draining to Class SA waters or within one-half mile of Class SA waters
and draining to unnamed freshwater tributaries shall not apply to development
activities and associated stormwater discharges that do not occur within
one-half mile of and draining to Class SA waters or are not within one-half
mile of Class SA waters and draining to unnamed freshwater tributaries."
SECTION 3.(b) Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143-214.7D. Limitations on built-upon area requirements.
(a) As used in this section, the term "built-upon area" means impervious surface and
partially impervious surface to the extent that the partially impervious surface does not allow
water to infiltrate through the surface and into the subsoil.
(b) For the purposes of implementing State or local government stormwater programs,
none of the following surfaces shall be considered "built-upon area" or an impervious or partially
impervious surface:
(1) A slatted deck.
(2) The water area of a swimming pool.
(3) A surface of number 57 stone, as designated by the American Society for
Testing and Materials, laid at least 4 inches thick over a geotextile fabric.
(4) A trail as defined in G.S. 113A-85 that is either unpaved or paved as long as
the pavement is porous with a hydraulic conductivity greater than 0.001
centimeters per second (1.41 inches per hour).
(5) Landscaping material, including, but not limited to, gravel, mulch, sand, and
vegetation, placed on areas that receive pedestrian or bicycle traffic or on
portions of driveways and parking areas that will not be compacted by the
weight of a vehicle, such as the area between sections of pavement that support
the weight of a vehicle.
(6) Artificial turf, manufactured to allow water to drain through the backing of
the turf, and installed according to the manufacturer's specifications over a
pervious surface.
(c) The owner or developer of a property may opt out of any of the exemptions from
"built-upon area" set out in subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Except as specifically required by federal law, a local government may not enact,
implement, or enforce a local government ordinance, comprehensive plan, or stormwater
Senate Bill 19-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
program that establishes a definition of "built-upon area" or impervious surface that does not
comply with subsection (b) of this section. This limitation shall apply regardless of any authority
granted by G.S. 143-214.5, G.S. 143-214.7, or Chapter 153A, 160A, or 160D of the General
Statutes.
(e) The Commission may adopt rules to implement this section."
SECTION 3.(c) Each unit of local government that operates a stormwater program
shall update its program to be consistent with G.S. 143-214.7D, as enacted by subsection (b) of
this section.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 4 Senate Bill 19-First Edition